Wyoming, session 2025, HB0307.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxiv), 22-9-125 by
creating a new subsection (e), 22-12-101 by creating a new
subsection (c), 22-14-102 and 22-15-109 are amended to
read:

22-1-102. Definitions.

HB0307

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0790
(a) The definitions contained in this chapter apply
to words and phrases used in this Election Code and govern
the construction of those words and phrases unless they are
specifically modified by the context in which they appear.
As used in this Election Code:

(xxiv) "Poll watcher" means a person certified
by the county chairman of a political party to observe
voter turn out, and voter registration and vote counting. A
"poll watcher" is not an election official;

22-9-125. Alternate procedures for collecting and
counting absentee ballots.

(e) The rights of poll watchers specified in W.S.
22-15-109 shall apply to any alternate procedures
implemented under this section.

22-12-101. Designation and notice of polling places;
external location; change in location.

HB0307

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0790
(c) The rights of poll watchers specified in W.S.
22-15-109 shall apply to the designation and notice of
polling places under this section.

22-14-102. Who may be present after all votes are
cast and polls close; making pollbooks agree; counting
votes.

After all the votes are cast and the polls are officially
declared closed, only election judges and poll watchers
shall be permitted in a polling place. When all ballots are
cast, the machine shall be locked against further voting
and sealed as prescribed by law. Except as otherwise
provided by W.S. 22-14-114(b), election judges shall
commence to count votes and shall continue without
adjournment until counting is completed. The rights of poll
watchers specified in W.S. 22-15-109 shall apply to the
procedures implemented and used under this section.

22-15-109. Poll watchers; certification;
qualification; authority; removal.

HB0307

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0790
(a) The county chairman of each political party may
having a candidate on the ballot shall certify volunteer
poll watchers prior to the day of the election to serve in
each polling place places. Not more than one (1) poll
watcher from each political party may serve simultaneously
unless the chief judge determines that one (1) additional
poll watcher from each political party may be accommodated
in the polling place without disrupting the polling
process. At polling places where multiple precincts are
served, there may be one (1) poll watcher for each
political party for each precinct served. More than one (1)
poll watcher may be present at the polling place for the
purposes of poll watchers switching shifts.

(b) A poll watcher shall belong to the political
party he represents and shall be a registered elector
residing in the county state. A poll watcher shall serve
only at the polling place places designated on the
certificate by the county chairman in accordance with
subsection (a) of this section. A poll watcher is
authorized to observe voter turn out and registration and
every aspect of the election. A poll watcher shall have the
authority to be located close enough to hear and see the
HB0307

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0790
voters as they check in with the election judges. A poll
watcher may make written memoranda but shall not challenge
voters, attempt to discern for whom an elector has voted,
conduct electioneering activities or disrupt the polling
process. A poll watcher shall not be prevented from
observing all activities and processes at polling places.
Poll watchers shall be allowed to observe polling place
setup procedures before the polls open and shut-down
procedures after the polls close on election day and during
any absentee voting period established under W.S. 22-9-125,
22-12-101 and 22-14-102.

(c) The chief judge may remove a poll watcher from
the polling place for disturbing the polling place, or for
any other violation of the Election Code. A state or county
chairman of a political party may designate another
certified poll watcher to replace a poll watcher removed
under this subsection and shall notify the county clerk of
the substitution. No poll watcher shall be denied the
ability to watch the polls for failure of a political party
to provide a poll watching schedule to the clerk before the
election.

HB0307

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0790
(d) For purposes of this section, certifications of
poll watchers under subsection (a) of this section shall be
considered delivered to the county clerk if sent
electronically before the commencement of early voting or
before the opening of the polls on election day.
Certifications made before the start of early voting may be
amended at any time until the opening of polls on election
day. The certification shall identify the training
completed by the poll watchers.

(e) Poll watchers shall be provided chairs at the
polling places.

(f) The county clerk may require poll watchers to
wear identification badges, provided that the clerk shall
not require poll watchers to wear special or customized
badges.

(g) The secretary of state shall have the authority
to promulgate rules to ensure that poll watchers may carry
out their duties under this section.
HB0307

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0790

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0307